Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-401
Consolidation; authority.

Any two or more cities of the second class or villages, lying adjacent to each other, may consolidate and become one city or village, as the case may be, and under the name and with all the powers, obligations, and duties of the city or village whose name shall be assumed and adopted in the proceedings provided in sections 17-402 and 17-403.

Laws 1879, § 91, p. 228;

R.S.1913, § 5082;

C.S.1922, § 4254;

C.S.1929, § 17-403;

R.S.1943, § 17-401;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 106.